Hawaii statutes.
CHAPTER 5

EMBLEMS
AND SYMBOLS

Section

5-1 to 4 Repealed

5-5 State seal, description

5-6 Seal; commercial use

5-6.5 State language

5-7 State popular name

5-7.5 "Aloha Spirit"

5-7.6 Aloha order of merit

5-7.7 Aloha order of merit location

5-8 State tree

5-9 State motto

5-10 State song

5-10.5 State musical instrument; ‘auana; kahiko

5-11 Repealed

5-11.3 State insect

5-11.5 State fish

5-12 State marine mammal

5-12.2 State land mammal

5-12.5 State mammal

5-13 Repealed

5-13.5 State individual sport

5-14 State team sport

5-15 State gem

5-15.5 State plant

5-16 State flower and individual island flowers

5-16.5 Official island colors

5-17 State bird

5-18 State flag

5-18.5 POW/MIA (prisoner of war/missing in
action)

flag; recognition; use

5-19 Description of the Hawaiian flag

5-20 Public display of Hawaiian flag; position

5-21 State dance

5-22 Hawaii medal of honor

Cross References

Prisoner of war and missing in action designations, see §121-10.5.

Previous
Vol01_Ch0001-0042F
Next